test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-Clex_tabahtud_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Verb - tábáhtuđ: # 
    tábáhtuđ+V+Inf: tábáhtuđ
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tábáhtuum
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tábáhtuuh
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tábáhtuvá
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: tábáhtuvveen
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: tábáhtuuvettee
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: tábáhtuv
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: tábáhtup
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tábáhtuuvetteđ
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tábáhtuveh
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tábáhtuvvim
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tábáhtuvvih
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tábáhtui
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: tábáhtuim
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: tábáhtuid
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: tábáhtuin
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: tábáhtuim
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: tábáhtuid
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tábáhtuvvii
    tábáhtuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: tábáhtuuččim
    tábáhtuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: tábáhtuuččih
    tábáhtuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: tábáhtuuččij
    tábáhtuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: tábáhtuuččáim
    tábáhtuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: tábáhtuuččáid
    tábáhtuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: tábáhtuuččáin
    tábáhtuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: tábáhtuuččijm
    tábáhtuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: tábáhtuuččijd
    tábáhtuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: tábáhtuuččii
    tábáhtuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: tábáhtužžeem
    tábáhtuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: tábáhtužžeeh
    tábáhtuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: tábáhtuš            # tábáhtuž
    tábáhtuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: tábáhtužžeen
    tábáhtuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: tábáhtušvettee      # tábáhtužvettee
    tábáhtuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: tábáhtužžuv
    tábáhtuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: tábáhtužžep
    tábáhtuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: tábáhtušvetteđ      # tábáhtužvetteđ
    tábáhtuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: tábáhtužeh

    tábáhtuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: tábáhtuu          
    tábáhtuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: tábáhtuvvus       # tábáhtus
    tábáhtuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: tábáhtuvvoon      # tábáhtoon
    tábáhtuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: tábáhtuvvee       # tábáhtoo
    tábáhtuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: tábáhtuvvus       # tábáhtus
    tábáhtuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: tábáhtuvvop       # tábáhtup
    tábáhtuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: tábáhtuđ          
    tábáhtuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: tábáhtuvvus       # tábáhtus
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: tábáhtuu
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: tábáhtum
    tábáhtuđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: tábáhtuččii
    tábáhtuđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: tábáhtužžii
    tábáhtuđ+V+PrsPrc: tábáhtuvvee
    tábáhtuđ+V+PrfPrc: tábáhtum
    tábáhtuđ+V+Actio+Nom: tábáhtum
    tábáhtuđ+V+Actio+Ess: tábáhtuumin
    tábáhtuđ+V+Actio+Loc: tábáhtuumist
    tábáhtuđ+V+Actio+Ill: tábáhtuumân
    tábáhtuđ+V+Actio+Com: tábáhtuudijn
    tábáhtuđ+V+VAbess: tábáhtuuhánnáá
    
    
  Verb - uáđistuđ: # 
    uáđistuđ+V+Inf: uáđistuđ
    uáđistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uáđistuum
    uáđistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: uáđistuuh
    uáđistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uáđistuvá
    uáđistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: uáđistuvveen
    uáđistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: uáđistuuvettee
    uáđistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: uáđistuv
    uáđistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: uáđistup
    uáđistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: uáđistuuvetteđ
    uáđistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: uáđistuveh
    uáđistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: uáđistuvvim
    uáđistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: uáđistuvvih
    uáđistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: uáđistui
    uáđistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: uáđistuim
    uáđistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: uáđistuid
    uáđistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: uáđistuin
    uáđistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: uáđistuim
    uáđistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: uáđistuid
    uáđistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: uáđistuvvii
    uáđistuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: uáđistuuččim
    uáđistuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: uáđistuuččih
    uáđistuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: uáđistuuččij
    uáđistuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: uáđistuuččáim
    uáđistuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: uáđistuuččáid
    uáđistuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: uáđistuuččáin
    uáđistuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: uáđistuuččijm
    uáđistuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: uáđistuuččijd
    uáđistuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: uáđistuuččii
    uáđistuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: uáđistužžeem
    uáđistuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: uáđistužžeeh
    uáđistuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: uáđistuš          # uáđistuž
    uáđistuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: uáđistužžeen
    uáđistuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: uáđistušvettee    # uáđistužvettee
    uáđistuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: uáđistužžuv
    uáđistuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: uáđistužžep
    uáđistuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: uáđistušvetteđ    # uáđistužvetteđ
    uáđistuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: uáđistužeh

    uáđistuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: uáđistuu        
    uáđistuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: uáđistuvvus     # uáđistus
    uáđistuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: uáđistuvvoon    # uáđistoon
    uáđistuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: uáđistuvvee     # uáđistoo
    uáđistuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: uáđistuvvus     # uáđistus
    uáđistuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: uáđistuvvop     # uáđistup
    uáđistuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: uáđistuđ        
    uáđistuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: uáđistuvvus     # uáđistus
    uáđistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: uáđistuu 
    uáđistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: uáđistum
    uáđistuđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: uáđistuččii
    uáđistuđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: uáđistužžii
    uáđistuđ+V+PrsPrc: uáđistuvvee
    uáđistuđ+V+PrfPrc: uáđistum
    uáđistuđ+V+Actio+Nom: uáđistum
    uáđistuđ+V+Actio+Ess: uáđistuumin
    uáđistuđ+V+Actio+Loc: uáđistuumist
    uáđistuđ+V+Actio+Ill: uáđistuumân
    uáđistuđ+V+Actio+Com: uáđistuudijn
    uáđistuđ+V+VAbess: uáđistuuhánnáá
    
    
  Verb - pillâšuđ: # 
    pillâšuđ+V+Inf: pillâšuđ
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pillâšuum
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: pillâšuuh
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pillâšuvá
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: pillâšuvveen
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: pillâšuuvettee
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: pillâšuv
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: pillâšup
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pillâšuuvetteđ
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pillâšuveh
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pillâšuvvim
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: pillâšuvvih
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pillâšui
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: pillâšuim
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: pillâšuid
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: pillâšuin
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: pillâšuim
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: pillâšuid
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pillâšuvvii
    pillâšuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: pillâšuuččim
    pillâšuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: pillâšuuččih
    pillâšuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: pillâšuuččij
    pillâšuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: pillâšuuččáim
    pillâšuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: pillâšuuččáid
    pillâšuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: pillâšuuččáin
    pillâšuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: pillâšuuččijm
    pillâšuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: pillâšuuččijd
    pillâšuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: pillâšuuččii
    pillâšuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: pillâšužžeem
    pillâšuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: pillâšužžeeh
    pillâšuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: pillâšuš            # pillâšuž
    pillâšuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: pillâšužžeen
    pillâšuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: pillâšušvettee      # pillâšužvettee
    pillâšuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: pillâšužžuv
    pillâšuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: pillâšužžep
    pillâšuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: pillâšušvetteđ      # pillâšužvetteđ
    pillâšuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: pillâšužeh

    pillâšuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: pillâšuu          
    pillâšuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: pillâšuvvus       # pillâšus
    pillâšuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: pillâšuvvoon      # pillâšoon
    pillâšuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: pillâšuvvee       # pillâšoo
    pillâšuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: pillâšuvvus       # pillâšus
    pillâšuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: pillâšuvvop       # pillâšup
    pillâšuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: pillâšuđ          
    pillâšuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: pillâšuvvus       # pillâšus
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: pillâšuu 
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: pillâšum
    pillâšuđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: pillâšuččii
    pillâšuđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: pillâšužžii
    pillâšuđ+V+PrsPrc: pillâšuvvee
    pillâšuđ+V+PrfPrc: pillâšum
    pillâšuđ+V+Actio+Nom: pillâšum
    pillâšuđ+V+Actio+Ess: pillâšuumin
    pillâšuđ+V+Actio+Loc: pillâšuumist
    pillâšuđ+V+Actio+Ill: pillâšuumân
    pillâšuđ+V+Actio+Com: pillâšuudijn
    pillâšuđ+V+VAbess: pillâšuuhánnáá
    
    
  Verb - rähistuđ: # 
    rähistuđ+V+Inf: rähistuđ
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rähistuum
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: rähistuuh
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rähistuvá
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: rähistuvveen
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: rähistuuvettee
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: rähistuv
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: rähistup
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: rähistuuvetteđ
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: rähistuveh
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: rähistuvvim
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: rähistuvvih
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: rähistui
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: rähistuim
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: rähistuid
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: rähistuin
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: rähistuim
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: rähistuid
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: rähistuvvii
    rähistuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: rähistuuččim
    rähistuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: rähistuuččih
    rähistuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: rähistuuččij
    rähistuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: rähistuuččáim
    rähistuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: rähistuuččáid
    rähistuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: rähistuuččáin
    rähistuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: rähistuuččijm
    rähistuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: rähistuuččijd
    rähistuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: rähistuuččii
    rähistuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: rähistužžeem
    rähistuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: rähistužžeeh
    rähistuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: rähistuš            # rähistuž
    rähistuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: rähistužžeen
    rähistuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: rähistušvettee      # rähistužvettee
    rähistuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: rähistužžuv
    rähistuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: rähistužžep
    rähistuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: rähistušvetteđ      # rähistužvetteđ
    rähistuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: rähistužeh

    rähistuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: rähistuu          
    rähistuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: rähistuvvus       # rähistus
    rähistuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: rähistuvvoon      # rähistoon
    rähistuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: rähistuvvee       # rähistoo
    rähistuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: rähistuvvus       # rähistus
    rähistuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: rähistuvvop       # rähistup
    rähistuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: rähistuđ          
    rähistuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: rähistuvvus       # rähistus
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: rähistuu 
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: rähistum
    rähistuđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: rähistuččii
    rähistuđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: rähistužžii
    rähistuđ+V+PrsPrc: rähistuvvee
    rähistuđ+V+PrfPrc: rähistum
    rähistuđ+V+Actio+Nom: rähistum
    rähistuđ+V+Actio+Ess: rähistuumin
    rähistuđ+V+Actio+Loc: rähistuumist
    rähistuđ+V+Actio+Ill: rähistuumân
    rähistuđ+V+Actio+Com: rähistuudijn
    rähistuđ+V+VAbess: rähistuuhánnáá
    
  Verb - ruásmuttuđ: # # MLO & Elsa-ákku
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Inf: ruásmuttuđ
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruásmuttuum
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ruásmuttuuh
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruásmuttuvá
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: ruásmuttuvveen
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: ruásmuttuuvettee
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: ruásmuttuv
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ruásmuttup
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ruásmuttuuvetteđ
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ruásmuttuveh
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ruásmuttuvvim
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ruásmuttuvvih
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ruásmuttui
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: ruásmuttuim
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: ruásmuttuid
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: ruásmuttuin
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: ruásmuttuim
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ruásmuttuid
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ruásmuttuvvii
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: ruásmuttuuččim
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: ruásmuttuuččih
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: ruásmuttuuččij
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: ruásmuttuuččáim
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: ruásmuttuuččáid
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: ruásmuttuuččáin
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: ruásmuttuuččijm
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: ruásmuttuuččijd
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: ruásmuttuuččii
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: ruásmuttužžeem
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: ruásmuttužžeeh
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: ruásmuttuš              # ruásmuttuž
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: ruásmuttužžeen
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: ruásmuttušvettee        # ruásmuttužvettee
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: ruásmuttužžuv
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: ruásmuttužžep
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: ruásmuttušvetteđ        # ruásmuttužvetteđ
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: ruásmuttužeh
